Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3234 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Research Attraction


Program (ORAP) to be developed and administered by the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education to promote increased research


capacity at eligible institutions of higher education by providing


matching funds to leverage private gifts for the enhancement of

Req. No. 2494 Page 1


research productivity and faculty recruitment. Private gifts shall


comply with the Foreign Investment Risk Review Modernization Act of


2018 and the Comprehensive Outbound Investment National Security Act


of 2025.


B. For the purposes of this section:


1. “Eligible institution” means an institution of higher


education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education; and


2. “Gift” means cash, cash equivalent, marketable securities,


closely held securities, money market holdings, partnership


interests, personal property, real property, mineral rights, and


life insurance proceeds.


C. An eligible institution that receives private gifts may be


eligible to receive a matching grant from funds appropriated to the


Oklahoma Research Attraction Program (ORAP) Revolving Fund created


in Section 2 of this act, subject to the availability of funding.


D. Matching grants provided pursuant to this section shall be


used by an eligible institution only for the support and maintenance


of educational and general activities including, but not limited to,


research and student services that promote increased research


capacity at the institution.


E. A matching grant received by an eligible institution


pursuant to this section that is not used by the institution in the


fiscal year for which it is provided may be used by the institution


in subsequent fiscal years.

Req. No. 2494 Page 2


F. The State Regents shall promulgate rules to implement the


provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3235 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education to be designated


the “Oklahoma Research Attraction Program (ORAP) Revolving Fund”.


The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year


limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the State


Regents from legislative appropriations provided for the purpose of


implementing the Oklahoma Research Attraction Program (ORAP) created


in Section 1 of this act. All monies accruing to the credit of the


fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the


State Regents for the purpose provided for in this section.


Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the


State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for


approval and payment.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2494 EB 1/15/2026 11:11:38 AM





Req. No. 2494 Page 3